Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1005
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the Age Discrimination in Employment Act or who forcibly resists, opposes, impedes, intimidates, or interferes with the Equal Opportunity Commission or any of its duly authorized representatives while engaged in its, his, or her duties under the act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. No person shall be imprisoned under this section except for a second or subsequent conviction.

Laws 1963, c. 281, § 5, p. 840;

Laws 1972, LB 1357, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 300;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 17.